Illinois, session 104th, HB3531.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1192 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1192 new)7    Sec. 5-1192. Paid leave for employees of school districts 8and park districts.9    (a) A county shall not require a school district organized 10under the School Code or a park district organized under the 11Park District Code to provide paid leave to the employees of 12the school district or park district.13    (b) A home rule unit may not regulate the provision of paid 14leave to the employees of a school district organized under 15the School Code or a park district organized under the Park 16District Code in a manner more restrictive than the regulation 17by the State of the provision of paid leave under this Section. 18This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 19of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 20exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 21by the State. 22    Section 10The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by adding   HB3531- 2 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1Section 10-4-13 as follows: 2    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-13 new)3    Sec. 10-4-13. Paid leave for employees of school districts 4and park districts. 5    (a) A township shall not require a school district 6organized under the School Code or a park district organized 7under the Park District Code to provide paid leave to the 8employees of the school district or park district.9    (b) A home rule unit may not regulate the provision of paid 10leave to the employees of a school district organized under 11the School Code or a park district organized under the Park 12District Code in a manner more restrictive than the regulation 13by the State of the provision of paid leave under this Section. 14This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 15of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 16exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 17by the State. 18    Section 15. The Paid Leave for All Workers Act is amended 19by changing Sections 10, 15, 30, and 35 as follows: 20    (820 ILCS 192/10)21    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:22    "Construction industry" means any constructing, altering, 23reconstructing, repairing, rehabilitating, refinishing,   HB3531- 3 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1refurbishing, remodeling, remediating, renovating, custom 2fabricating, maintenance, landscaping, improving, wrecking, 3painting, decorating, demolishing, or adding to or subtracting 4from any building, structure, highway, roadway, street, 5bridge, alley, sewer, ditch, sewage disposal plant, 6waterworks, parking facility, railroad, excavation or other 7structure, project, development, real property, or 8improvement, or to do any part thereof, whether or not the 9performance of the work herein described involves the addition 10to or fabrication into, any structure, project, development, 11real property, or improvement herein described of any material 12or article of merchandise.13    "Construction industry" also includes moving construction 14related materials on the job site or to or from the job site, 15snow plowing, snow removal, and refuse collection.16    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Labor.17    "Domestic work" and "domestic worker" have the same 18meanings as defined in Section 10 of the Domestic Workers' 19Bill of Rights Act, except that "domestic worker" also 20includes independent contractors, sole proprietors, and 21partnerships.22    "Employee" has the same application and meaning as that 23provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 24Collection Act. "Employee" also includes all domestic workers, 25and, for the purposes of this Act, domestic workers shall not 26be excluded as employees under the provisions of item (1),   HB3531- 4 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1(2), or (3) of Section 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 2Collection Act. For the purposes of this definition, an 3employee shall be a resident of this State. "Employee" does 4not include: 5        (1) an employee as defined in the federal Railroad 6    Unemployment Insurance Act (45 U.S.C. 351 et seq.) or the 7    Railway Labor Act; 8        (2) a student enrolled in and regularly attending 9    classes in a college or university that is also the 10    student's employer, and who is employed on a temporary 11    basis at less than full time at the college or university, 12    but this exclusion applies only to work performed for that 13    college or university; or14        (3) a short-term employee who is employed by an 15    institution of higher education for less than 2 16    consecutive calendar quarters during a calendar year and 17    who does not have a reasonable expectation that they will 18    be rehired by the same employer of the same service in a 19    subsequent calendar year; . 20        (4) an employee engaged in the transportation of goods 21    through this State; or 22        (5) an employee who is free to decide what time the 23    employee performs duties for an employer. 24    "Employer" has the same application and meaning as that 25provided in Sections 1 and 2 of the Illinois Wage Payment and 26Collection Act, except that for purposes of this Act,   HB3531- 5 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1"employer" also means the State and units of local government, 2any political subdivision of the State or units of local 3government, or any State or local government agency. 4    "Employer" does not include school districts organized 5under the School Code or park districts organized under the 6Park District Code. 7    "Writing" or "written" means a printed or printable 8communication in physical or electronic format, including a 9communication that is transmitted through electronic mail, 10text message, or a computer system or is otherwise sent or 11stored electronically.12(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (820 ILCS 192/15)14    Sec. 15. Provision of paid leave. 15    (a) An employee who works in Illinois is entitled to earn 16and use up to a minimum of 40 hours of paid leave during a 1712-month period or a pro rata number of hours of paid leave 18under the provisions of subsection (b). The paid leave may be 19used by the employee for any purpose as long as the paid leave 20is taken in accordance with the provisions of this Act.21    (b) Paid leave under this Act shall accrue at the rate of 22one hour of paid leave for every 40 hours worked up to a 23minimum of 40 hours of paid leave or such greater amount if the 24employer provides more than 40 hours. Employees who are exempt 25from the overtime requirements of the federal Fair Labor   HB3531- 6 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1Standards Act (29 U.S.C. 213(a)(1)) shall be deemed to work 40 2hours in each workweek for purposes of paid leave accrual 3unless their regular workweek is less than 40 hours, in which 4case paid leave accrues based on that regular workweek. 5Employees shall determine how much paid leave they need to 6use; , however, employers may set a reasonable minimum 7increment for the use of paid leave not to exceed 2 hours per 8day. If an employee's scheduled workday is less than 2 hours 9per day, the employee's scheduled workday shall be used to 10determine the amount of paid leave. Employers who voluntarily 11provide all employees with one hour of paid leave for every 40 12hours worked in a 12-month period are exempt from this Act.13    (c) An employer may make available the minimum number of 14hours of paid leave, subject to pro rata requirements provided 15in subsection (b), to an employee on the first day of 16employment or the first day of the 12-month period. Employers 17that provide the minimum number of hours of paid leave to an 18employee on the first day of employment or the first day of the 1912-month period are not required to carry over carryover paid 20leave from 12-month period to 12-month period and may require 21employees to use all paid leave prior to the end of the benefit 22period or forfeit the unused paid leave. However, under no 23circumstances shall an employee be credited with paid leave 24that is less than what the employee would have accrued under 25subsections (a) and (g) of this Section.26    (d) The 12-month period may be any consecutive 12-month   HB3531- 7 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1period designated by the employer in writing at the time of 2hire. Changes to the 12-month period may be made by the 3employer if notice is given to employees in writing prior to 4the change and the change does not reduce the eligible accrual 5rate and paid leave available to the employee. If the employer 6changes the designated 12-month period, the employer shall 7provide the employee with documentation of the balance of 8hours worked, paid leave accrued and taken, and the remaining 9paid leave balance.10    (e) Paid leave under this Act may be taken by an employee 11for any reason of the employee's choosing. An employee is not 12required to provide an employer a reason for the leave and may 13not be required to provide documentation or certification as 14proof or in support of the leave. An employee may choose 15whether to use paid leave provided under this Act prior to 16using any other leave provided by the employer or State law.17    (f) Employees shall be paid their hourly rate of pay for 18paid leave. However, employees engaged in an occupation in 19which gratuities or commissions have customarily and usually 20constituted and have been recognized as part of the 21remuneration for hire purposes shall be paid by their employer 22at least the full minimum wage in the jurisdiction in which 23they are employed when paid leave is taken. This wage shall be 24treated as the employee's regular rate of pay for purposes of 25this Act.26    (g) Paid leave under this Act shall begin to accrue at the   HB3531- 8 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1commencement of employment or on the effective date of this 2Act, whichever is later. Employees shall be entitled to begin 3using paid leave 90 days following commencement of their 4employment or 90 days following the effective date of this 5Act, whichever is later.6    (h) Paid leave under this Act shall be provided upon the 7oral or written request of an employee in accordance with the 8employer's reasonable paid leave policy notification 9requirements which may include the following: 10        (1) If use of paid leave under this Act is 11    foreseeable, the employer may require the employee to 12    provide 7 calendar days' notice before the date the leave 13    is to begin. 14        (2) If paid leave under this Act is not foreseeable, 15    the employee shall provide such notice as soon as is 16    practicable after the employee is aware of the necessity 17    of the leave. An employer that requires notice of paid 18    leave under this Act when the leave is not foreseeable 19    shall provide a written policy that contains procedures 20    for the employee to provide notice.21        (3) Employers shall provide employees with written 22    notice of the paid leave policy notification requirements 23    in this Section in the manner provided in Section 20 for 24    notice and posting and within 5 calendar days of any 25    change to the employer's reasonable paid leave policy 26    notification requirements.   HB3531- 9 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1        (4) An employer may not require, as a condition of 2    providing paid leave under this Act, that the employee 3    search for or find a replacement worker to cover the hours 4    during which the employee takes paid leave.5    (i) Except as provided in subsection (c), paid leave under 6this Act shall carry over annually to the extent not used by 7the employee, provided that nothing in this Act shall be 8construed to require an employer to provide more than 40 hours 9of paid leave for an employee in the 12-month period unless the 10employer agrees to do so. 11    (j) Nothing in this Section or any other Illinois law or 12rule shall be construed as requiring financial or other 13payment to an employee from an employer upon the employee's 14termination, resignation, retirement, or other separation from 15employment for paid leave accrued under this Act that has not 16been used. Nothing in this Section or any other Illinois law or 17rule shall be construed as requiring financial or other 18reimbursements to an employee from an employer for unused paid 19leave under this Act at the end of the benefit year or any 20other time. 21    (k) If an employee is transferred to a separate division, 22entity, or location, but remains employed by the same 23employer, the employee is entitled to all paid leave accrued 24at the prior division, entity, or location and is entitled to 25use all paid leave as provided in this Section. If there is a 26separation from employment and the employee is rehired within   HB3531- 10 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b112 months of separation by the same employer, previously 2accrued paid leave that had not been used by the employee shall 3be reinstated. The employee shall be entitled to use accrued 4paid leave at the commencement of employment following a 5separation from employment of 12 months or less.6    (l) Paid leave under this Act shall not be charged or 7otherwise credited to an employee's paid time off bank or 8employee account unless the employer's policy permits such a 9credit. If the paid leave under this Act is credited to an 10employee's paid time off bank or employee vacation account 11then any unused paid leave shall be paid to the employee upon 12the employee's termination, resignation, retirement, or other 13separation to the same extent as vacation time under existing 14Illinois law or rule. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to 15waive or otherwise limit an employee's right to final 16compensation for promised and earned, but unpaid vacation time 17or paid time off, as provided under the Illinois Wage Payment 18and Collection Act and rules. Employers shall provide 19employees with written notice of changes to the employer's 20vacation time, paid time off, or other paid leave policies 21that affect an employee's right to final compensation for such 22leave. 23    (m) During any period an employee takes leave under this 24Act, the employer shall maintain coverage for the employee and 25any family member under any group health plan for the duration 26of such leave at no less than the level and conditions of   HB3531- 11 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1coverage that would have been provided if the employee had not 2taken the leave. The employer shall notify the employee that 3the employee is still responsible for paying the employee's 4share of the cost of the health care coverage, if any. 5    (n) Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to interfere with, 6impede, or in any way diminish the right of employees to 7bargain collectively with their employers through 8representatives of their own choosing in order to establish 9wages or other conditions of work in excess of the applicable 10minimum standards established in this Act. The paid leave 11requirements of this Act may be waived in a bona fide 12collective bargaining agreement, but only if the waiver is set 13forth explicitly in such agreement in clear and unambiguous 14terms.15    Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to affect the validity 16or change the terms of bona fide collective bargaining 17agreements in effect on January 1, 2024. After that date, 18requirements of this Act may be waived in a bona fide 19collective bargaining agreement, but only if the waiver is set 20forth explicitly in such agreement in clear and unambiguous 21terms.22    In no event shall this Act apply to any employee working in 23the construction industry or any employee working in a trade 24who is covered by a bona fide collective bargaining agreement, 25nor shall this Act apply to any employee who is covered by a 26bona fide collective bargaining agreement with an employer   HB3531- 12 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1that provides services nationally and internationally of 2delivery, pickup, and transportation of parcels, documents, 3and freight.4    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, nothing 5in this Act shall be deemed to affect the validity or change 6the terms of a bona fide collective bargaining agreement 7applying to an employee who is employed by a State agency that 8is in effect on July 1, 2024. After that date, requirements of 9this Act may be waived in a bona fide collective bargaining 10agreement, but only if the waiver is set forth explicitly in 11such agreement in clear and unambiguous terms. As used in this 12subsection, "State agency" has the same meaning as set forth 13in Section 4 of the Forms Notice Act.14    (o) An agreement by an employee to waive his or her rights 15under this Act is void as against public policy.16    (p) The provisions of this Act shall not apply to any 17employer that is covered by a municipal or county ordinance 18that is in effect on the effective date of this Act that 19requires employers to give any form of paid leave to their 20employees, including paid sick leave or paid leave. 21Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, any 22employer that is not required to provide paid leave to its 23employees, including paid sick leave or paid leave, under a 24municipal or county ordinance that is in effect on the 25effective date of this Act shall be subject to the provisions 26of this Act if the employer would be required to provide paid   HB3531- 13 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1leave under this Act to its employees.2    Any local ordinance that provides paid leave, including 3paid sick leave or paid leave, enacted or amended after the 4effective date of this Act must comply with the requirements 5of this Act or provide benefits, rights, and remedies that are 6greater than or equal to the benefits, rights, and remedies 7afforded under this Act.8    An employer in a municipality or county that enacts or 9amends a local ordinance that provides paid leave, including 10paid sick leave or paid leave, after the effective date of this 11Act shall only comply with the local ordinance or ordinances 12so long as the benefits, rights, and remedies are greater than 13or equal to the benefits, rights, and remedies afforded under 14this Act.15(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 16revised 10-23-24.) 17    (820 ILCS 192/30)18    Sec. 30. Department responsibilities. 19    (a) The Department shall administer and enforce this Act. 20The Department has the powers and the parties have the rights 21provided in the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act for 22contested cases.23    (b) An employee may file a complaint with the Department 24alleging violations of the Act within 3 years after the 25alleged violation. An employer that violates this Act is   HB3531- 14 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1liable to any affected employee for damages in the form of the 2actual underpayment, compensatory damages, and a penalty of 3not less than $500 and no more than $1,000. Employees shall 4also be entitled to such equitable relief as may be 5appropriate, in addition to reasonable attorney's fees; 6reasonable expert witness fees, and other costs of the action, 7which shall be paid by the employer to the employee. 8    (c) The Department has the power to conduct investigations 9in connection with the administration and enforcement of this 10Act. The Department shall make a determination of the severity 11of a violation by considering the totality of the 12circumstances, prior to conducting , including the power to 13conduct depositions and discovery and issuing to issue 14subpoenas. If the Department finds cause to believe that this 15Act has been violated, the Department shall notify the parties 16in writing of the violation, the applicable penalty as 17described in Section 35, and the 14-day period provided to 18cure the violation, and the matter shall be referred to an 19Administrative Law Judge to schedule a formal hearing in 20accordance with hearing procedures established by rule. 21Administrative decisions shall be reviewed under the 22Administrative Review Law.23    (d) The Department is authorized to impose civil penalties 24prescribed in Section 35 for any violation of this Act. 25    (e) The Department is authorized to collect and supervise 26the payment of any damages awarded pursuant to Section 25 and   HB3531- 15 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1subsection (b) of this Section to an employee or employees 2under this Act. Any sums recovered by the Department on behalf 3of an employee or employees under this Act shall be paid to the 4employee or employees affected. The Department is not 5authorized to collect and supervise the payment of any awarded 6attorney's fees. Those fees shall be subject to collection by 7the attorney awarded such fees.8    (f) The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce 9the collection of any awards made under this Act.10    (g) The Department shall adopt rules necessary to 11administer and enforce this Act.12(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.) 13    (820 ILCS 192/35)14    Sec. 35. Penalties and enforcement. An employer that 15violates this Act or any rule adopted under this Act shall be 16subject to a civil penalty of:17        (1) for a first offense, a fine not to exceed $250;18        (2) for a second offense, following a period of 14 19    days to cure the violation, a fine not to exceed $1,000; 20    and21        (3) for a third or subsequent offense, a fine not to 22    exceed $2,500,23    The Department shall have discretion to waive any civil 24penalty under this Section. In determining the amount of the 25penalty under this Section, the Department shall consider the   HB3531- 16 -LRB104 10568 SPS 20644 b1appropriateness of the penalty compared to the size of the 2business operated by the employer $2,500 for each separate 3offense. An offense means any violation of this Act with the 4exception of a violation of the notice requirement in 5subsection (c) of Section 20. Any penalties collected from an 6employer under this Section or under subsection (d) of Section 720 for violations of this Act shall be deposited into the Paid 8Leave for All Workers Fund, a special fund created in the State 9treasury that is dedicated to enforcing this Act. 10(Source: P.A. 102-1143, eff. 1-1-24.)